District of Columbia statutes.
11-1915

Fraud in the selection process.

An individual who commits fraud in the processing or selection of jurors or prospective jurors, either by causing any name to be inserted into any list maliciously or by causing any name to be deleted from any list maliciously (including malicious data entry or the altering of any data processing machine or any set of instructions or programs which control data processing equipment for such malicious purpose), is guilty of the crime of jury tampering, and, upon conviction, may be punished by a fine of not more than $10,000, imprisonment for not more than two years, or both. This section shall not limit any other provisions of law concerning the crime of jury tampering.

Nov. 14, 1986, 100 Stat. 3635, Pub. L. 99-650, § 2

History

1981 Ed., § 11-1915.

Prior Codifications

Short title: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 11-1901.

Short Title